Alabama, session 2026rs, HB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1.(a) This section shall be known and may be
cited as the Alabama Post-Election Audit Act.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
the judge of probate of each county shall order a
post-election audit, after every countywide and statewide
general election, of all ballots in one precinct of a
countywide or statewide race randomly selected by the
canvassing board of each county as further provided in
subdivision (2), which appeared on the ballot and which is not
subject to a recount. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
the judge of probate from ordering the audit of additional
precincts and races. The order shall include the name of the
precincts and the races to be audited. The order shall
authorize the sheriff or other county authority to provide
access to the ballot containers along with any other necessary
election materials, including electronic data.
(2) The canvassing board of each county , at noon on
the second Friday after any county and statewide general
election, shall randomly select at least one precinct,
excluding absentee and provisional ballots, and at least one
Page 1

excluding absentee and provisional ballots, and at least one
HB95 Enrolled
statewide or countywide race to be audited by the judge of
probate.
(3) The judge of probate, at noon on the second Friday
after any county and statewide general election, shall select
the date, time, and place of meeting to conduct the
post-election audit and shall appoint an inspector and the
appropriate number of other poll workers required to complete
the audit in the same manner as for any other election. The
notification and publication of these appointments shall be in
the same manner as provided in Section 17-8-2, Code of Alabama
1975. Compensation for poll workers shall be the same as
provided in Section 17-8-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
(4) To begin the audit process, the voted ballot
containers subject to the audit shall be delivered, unopened
and still sealed in the original containers, to the inspectors
in charge of the audit by the custodian of the ballot
containers along with any other necessary election materials,
including electronic data.
(5) The post-election audit shall commence no earlier
than 31 days following the statewide general election or the
expiration of the time period for filing an election contest,
whichever is less, and shall be completed within 30 days of
commencement.
(6) At the conclusion of the audit, the ballots shall
be returned to their original containers and sealed. All other
documents and materials related to the audit, including, but
not limited to, inspector and poll worker oaths, poll watcher
oaths, seals and testing materials for any tabulator used in
Page 2

oaths, seals and testing materials for any tabulator used in
HB95 Enrolled
the audit, and copies of orders of the probate court related
to the audit shall be placed in a separate container labeled
"Record of Audit." The inspector and other poll workers shall
sign the containers and return them to the appropriate
authority for storage with other records related to the
audited election. The judge of probate shall report the
findings to the Secretary of State, who shall make all results
from the post-election audit public by posting the results on
the official website of the Secretary of State.
(7) The post-election audit report shall include all of
the following:
a. A description of any problems or discrepancies
encountered.
b. A description of the likely cause of any problems or
discrepancies encountered.
c. Recommendations for corrective or remedial actions.
(8) The Secretary of State shall report all findings of
the post-election audit to the Governor and the Legislature
within 30 days of receipt of the audits.
(9) Poll watchers shall attend and observe the
post-election audit in the same manner as for any other
election, and appointments shall be made in the same manner as
any general election. The judge of probate shall give notice
to the public of the date, time, and location of the audit by
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county or on the county's official website. Accredited members
of the media shall be permitted to be present and observe the
audit being performed.
Page 3

audit being performed.
HB95 Enrolled
(10) The judge of probate may conduct the post-election
audit by manual tally or by use of ballot counters, provided
that at least 30 randomly selected ballots are individually,
manually examined and compared to the ballot counter result
for each selected ballot.
(c) All expenses incurred by any county as a result of
the audit shall be reimbursed in full by the Comptroller.
(d) The Secretary of State may adopt rules and
prescribe forms to implement this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 4

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB95 Enrolled





100
101
102
103
104
105 ________________________________________________
106 Speaker of the House of Representatives
107
108
109
110 ________________________________________________
111 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
112
113
114 House of Representatives
115
116 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
117 was passed by the House 15-Jan-26, as amended.
118
119 John Treadwell
120 Clerk
121
122
123
124
125
126 Senate 31-Mar-26 Amended and Passed
127
128 House Concurred in Senate
129 Amendment
130
131
Page 5